Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2527
Briefs; payment for printing by county.

The cost of printing briefs on behalf of any person convicted of an offense for which the punishment adjudged is capital shall be paid by the county.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2527 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.